Georgia, session 2025_26, HB437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 3 of Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to educational programs under the "Quality Basic Education Act," is amended by
H. B. 437
- 1 -

LC 49 2105
revising Code Section 20-2-156, relating to program for limited-English-proficient students,
as follows:
"20-2-156.
(a) The State Board of Education shall create a program for limited-English-proficient
students whose native language is not English, subject to appropriation by the General
Assembly. The purpose of this program is to assist such students to develop proficiency
in the English language, including listening, speaking, reading, and writing, sufficient to
perform effectively at the currently assigned grade level. The state board shall prescribe
such rules and regulations regarding eligibility criteria and standards as may be needed to
carry out the provisions of this Code section. The state board shall also prescribe rules and
regulations regarding community outreach efforts by local school systems to ensure that
limited-English-proficient students and their parents and guardians are provided
information regarding the program. This program may also be referred to as the English
for speakers of other languages (ESOL) program.
(b) The State Board of Education shall establish standards for foreign language interpreters
working with students in educational settings. Such standards shall include, but shall not
be limited to:
(1) Demonstrated proficiency in English and the target language in listening, speaking,
and reading domains; and
(2) Familiarity with legal concepts related to and service requirements of Part B of the
federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA) and Section 504 of the federal
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as well as standards for the use of remote interpreter services,
including, but not limited to, the conditions under which remote interpreter services may
be used to provide high-quality interpreter services.
(c) Each local school system shall provide to limited-English-proficient parents and
guardians, in a language easily understood by such parents and guardians, information
regarding their children relative to the following:
H. B. 437
- 2 -

LC 49 2105
(1) School registration, enrollment, and withdrawal;
(2) Grievance procedures;
(3) Notices of all school programs, including, but not limited to, talented and gifted
programs, early intervention programs, special education programs, art and music
programs, and athletic programs;
(4) Student discipline policies and procedures, student codes of conduct, handbooks, and
similar materials;
(5) Report cards;
(6) Language assistance programs;
(7) School choice opportunities; and
(8) Parent-teacher conferences.
(d) Each local school system shall provide to limited-English-proficient parents and
guardians in a language easily understood by such parents and guardians, regarding their
children:
(1) Information regarding the availability of interpretation services at any meeting with
school representatives;
(2) An explanation of how parents or guardians can request an interpreter;
(3) Notice that a parent or guardian has the right to request that the interpreter serve no
other role in the meeting than as an interpreter, and that the local school system should
make reasonable efforts to fulfill this request; and
(4) A point of contact to address any questions or complaints about interpretation
services.
(e) For each meeting a school representative has with limited-English-proficient parents
and guardians regarding their children, the recorded minutes of such meeting shall reflect:
(1) Whether a parent or guardian requested an interpreter, had previously requested
interpretation services, or had otherwise indicated that an interpreter was necessary to
ensure meaningful parental or guardian involvement in the meeting;
H. B. 437
- 3 -

LC 49 2105
(2) The language for interpretation;
(3) Whether a qualified interpreter was provided or a parent or guardian provided an
interpreter of his or her own choosing; and
(4) Whether a parent or guardian requested that the interpreter serve no other role in the
IEP meeting and, if so, whether the local school district granted such request.
(f) Each local school system shall engage in community outreach efforts directed toward
limited-English-proficient students and their parents and guardians. Such efforts shall
comply with the rules and regulations prescribed by the State Board of Education pursuant
to subsection (a) of this Code section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 437
- 4 -